Idaho, session 2026, S1363.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to Natural Resources the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and ex-
pense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY:
A. ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $3,369,500 $1,825,700 $1,855,800 $7,051,000
Air Quality Permitting
Fund 232,900 51,600 23,500 308,000
Public Water System Supervision
Fund 350,300 73,000 74,500 497,800
Environmental Remediation (Box)
Fund 15,500 10,000 25,500
Environmental Remediation (Basin)
Fund 20,000 14,400 12,600 47,000
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 351,700 111,100 95,900 558,700
Idaho Underground Storage Tank Program
Fund 59,100 15,900 18,400 93,400
IPDES Program
Fund 318,000 50,500 58,100 426,600
Bunker Hill Trust
Fund 4,200 6,800 5,900 16,900
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 1,680,000 1,211,600 1,180,200 4,071,800
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 4,900 0 0 4,900
TOTAL $6,406,100 $3,370,600 $3,324,900 $13,101,600
B. AIR QUALITY:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $5,297,200 $213,600 $5,510,800
Air Quality Permitting
Fund 1,526,800 59,700 1,586,500
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 446,400 393,000 $300,000 1,139,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 1,242,600 1,971,200 1,241,400 4,455,200
TOTAL $8,513,000 $2,637,500 $1,541,400 $12,691,900
C. WATER QUALITY:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $9,937,200 $1,765,500 $488,500 $12,191,200
Public Water System Supervision
Fund 1,677,800 299,700 1,977,500
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 663,900 743,700 1,771,600 3,179,200
IPDES Program
Fund 1,371,400 196,400 1,567,800
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 6,542,500 13,440,000 2,333,200 22,315,700
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 32,900 0 0 32,900
TOTAL $20,225,700 $16,445,300 $4,593,300 $41,264,300
D. COEUR D'ALENE BASIN COMMISSION:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $214,500 $10,200 $224,700
Environmental Remediation (Basin)
Fund 186,800 15,500 202,300
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 16,100 0 $50,000 66,100
TOTAL $417,400 $25,700 $50,000 $493,100
E. WASTE MANAGEMENT AND REMEDIATION:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $3,094,800 $156,200 $94,600 $3,345,600
Environmental Remediation (Box)
Fund 283,800 97,300 210,500 591,600


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Environmental Remediation (Basin)
Fund 292,900 58,500 280,000 631,400
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 1,067,200 1,166,600 51,800 2,285,600
Idaho Underground Storage Tank Program
Fund 296,800 25,000 321,800
Bunker Hill Trust
Fund 139,900 4,390,000 375,000 4,904,900
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 3,183,000 8,242,900 2,500,500 13,926,400
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 13,400 0 0 13,400
TOTAL $8,371,800 $14,136,500 $3,512,400 $26,020,700
F. IDAHO NATIONAL LABORATORY OVERSIGHT:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $179,100 $8,700 $187,800
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 1,301,200 1,318,800 $146,900 2,766,900
TOTAL $1,480,300 $1,327,500 $146,900 $2,954,700
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $45,414,300 $37,943,100 $3,324,900 $9,844,000 $96,526,300
II. DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $6,206,600 $5,893,100 $12,099,700
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 1,071,600 283,800 1,355,400
Fish and Game Set-Aside
Fund 31,300 31,300
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 22,200 22,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Expendable Big Game Depredation
Fund 2,900 2,900
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 8,100 8,100
Fish and Game Nonexpendable Trust
Fund 3,600 3,600
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 4,473,700 5,841,300 10,315,000
TOTAL $11,751,900 $12,086,300 $23,838,200
B. ENFORCEMENT:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $13,500,400 $2,895,600 $16,396,000
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 186,000 77,000 263,000
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 20,600 20,600
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 26,400 26,400
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 2,300 6,700 9,000
TOTAL $13,688,700 $3,026,300 $16,715,000
C. FISHERIES:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $5,223,700 $7,691,400 $12,915,100
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 3,655,800 8,333,200 11,989,000
Fish and Game Set-Aside
Fund 400,700 575,700 976,400
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 179,200 165,700 344,900
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 36,000 333,000 369,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Fish and Game Nonexpendable Trust
Fund 33,200 33,200
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 16,656,500 14,465,100 31,121,600
TOTAL $26,151,900 $31,597,300 $57,749,200
D. WILDLIFE:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $7,881,400 $6,625,600 $174,800 $14,681,800
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 632,000 1,054,100 1,686,100
Fish and Game Set-Aside
Fund 192,200 3,666,000 3,858,200
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 1,336,900 325,300 1,662,200
Expendable Big Game Depredation
Fund 1,800,000 1,800,000
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 319,400 896,100 1,215,500
Fish and Game Nonexpendable Trust
Fund 11,500 2,300 13,800
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 8,218,000 10,546,400 0 18,764,400
TOTAL $18,591,400 $23,115,800 $1,974,800 $43,682,000
E. COMMUNICATIONS:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $2,016,700 $704,800 $2,721,500
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 49,600 35,700 85,300
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 30,900 89,000 119,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 1,908,800 518,600 2,427,400
TOTAL $4,006,000 $1,348,100 $5,354,100
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $74,189,900 $71,173,800 $1,974,800 $147,338,500
III. ENDOWMENT FUND INVESTMENT BOARD:
FROM:
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $81,900 $14,500 $96,400
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 718,600 204,700 923,300
TOTAL $800,500 $219,200 $1,019,700
IV. DEPARTMENT OF LANDS:
A. BUSINESS SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $541,600 $415,100 $956,700
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 160,900 129,000 289,900
Department of Lands
Fund 942,200 671,100 1,613,300
Navigable Waterways
Fund 1,600 1,600
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 2,898,400 3,230,300 6,128,700
TOTAL $4,544,700 $4,445,500 $8,990,200
B. FOREST RESOURCES MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,138,400 $494,400 $20,000 $1,652,800
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 75,500 324,000 399,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Department of Lands
Fund 1,604,500 908,100 2,512,600
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 388,200 82,900 471,100
Community Forestry
Fund 20,000 20,000 40,000
Federal Grant
Fund 1,204,700 3,125,700 5,415,400 9,745,800
TOTAL $4,411,300 $4,955,100 $5,455,400 $14,821,800
C. TRUST LAND MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $153,500 $2,200 $155,700
Department of Lands
Fund 172,200 279,000 451,200
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 16,467,900 13,829,300 $50,000 30,347,200
TOTAL $16,793,600 $14,110,500 $50,000 $30,954,100
D. FOREST AND RANGE FIRE PROTECTION:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,860,800 $766,100 $1,660,900 $7,287,800
Department of Lands
Fund 5,321,800 989,800 956,500 7,268,100
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 57,500 57,500
Federal Grant
Fund 826,400 1,305,000 450,000 2,581,400
TOTAL $11,009,000 $3,060,900 $3,124,900 $17,194,800
E. SCALING PRACTICES:
FROM:
Department of Lands
Fund $264,600 $58,200 $322,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
F. MINERALS, PUBLIC TRUST, OIL AND GAS:
FROM:
General
Fund $936,900 $134,000 $1,070,900
Department of Lands
Fund 571,300 901,900 1,473,200
Oil and Gas Conservation
Fund 165,900 107,800 273,700
Navigable Waterways
Fund 1,022,400 443,800 1,466,200
TOTAL $2,696,500 $1,587,500 $4,284,000
DIVISION
TOTAL $39,719,700 $28,217,700 $50,000 $8,580,300 $76,567,700
V.DEPARTMENTOFPARKSANDRECREATION--PARKOPERATIONSPROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,217,100 $940,900 $4,158,000
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 325,200 199,600 524,800
Parks and Recreation
Fund 12,378,000 5,513,200 $420,000 18,311,200
Recreational Fuels
Fund 719,400 928,500 2,971,800 4,619,700
Parks and Recreation Registration
Fund 1,520,100 1,351,400 10,350,000 13,221,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 19,600 92,100 111,700
Public Recreation Enterprise
Fund 898,000 1,429,000 2,327,000
Parks and Recreation Expendable Trust
Fund 610,600 405,600 1,016,200
Federal Grant
Fund 1,339,500 631,200 4,227,500 6,198,200
TOTAL $21,027,500 $11,491,500 $17,969,300 $50,488,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
VI. DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES:
A. MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $933,800 $919,700 $1,853,500
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 194,700 198,100 392,800
Water Administration
Fund 21,800 21,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 177,400 177,400
TOTAL $1,128,500 $1,317,000 $2,445,500
B. PLANNING AND TECHNICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,044,500 $30,823,500 $6,713,400 $41,581,400
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 65,900 65,900
Aquifer Planning and Management
Fund 1,250,100 457,400 1,707,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 164,500 164,500
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 50,000,000 50,000,000
Federal Grant
Fund 379,700 857,700 0 1,237,400
TOTAL $5,674,300 $32,369,000 $56,713,400 $94,756,700
C. WATER MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,482,900 $2,274,300 $9,757,200
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 70,900 70,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Water Administration
Fund 1,742,500 235,000 1,977,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,121,200 320,200 1,441,400
Federal Grant
Fund 303,900 348,800 652,700
TOTAL $10,650,500 $3,249,200 $13,899,700
D. NORTHERN IDAHO ADJUDICATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $291,800 $196,300 $488,100
Northern Idaho Adjudication
Fund 97,500 38,700 136,200
TOTAL $389,300 $235,000 $624,300
E. BEAR RIVER BASIN ADJUDICATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $620,900 $162,500 $783,400
Bear River Basin Adjudication
Fund 97,500 0 97,500
TOTAL $718,400 $162,500 $880,900
DIVISION
TOTAL $18,561,000 $37,332,700 $56,713,400 $112,607,100
GRANDTOTAL $199,712,900 $186,378,000 $3,374,900 $95,081,800 $484,547,600
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs in Natural Resources is authorized no more
than the following number of full-time equivalent positions at any point
during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, unless specifically
authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
Department of Environmental Quality ..........................375.00
Department of Fish and Game ...................................550.00
Endowment Fund Investment Board ................................4.00
Department of Lands ..........................................334.93
Department of Parks and Recreation ............................195.80


Department of Water Resources ................................171.00
SECTION 3. REMEDIATION PROJECT REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. Moneys de-
posited into the Environmental Remediation (Basin) Fund shall be used for
remediation of the Coeur d'Alene Basin in accordance with the Superfund
contract with the Environmental Protection Agency. The Department of En-
vironmental Quality shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the
Legislature, and the Basin Environmental Improvement Project Commission on
the remediation progress and the expenditures involved.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER FOR WASTE REMEDIATION. There is hereby ap-
propriated to the Department of Environmental Quality and the Office of the
State Controller shall transfer $1,500,000 from the Water Pollution Control
Fund to the Environmental Remediation (Basin) Fund on July 1, 2026, or as
soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027, to be used for Superfund cleanup projects in the Coeur d'Alene Basin.
SECTION 5. CASH TRANSFER FOR AGRICULTURAL BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES
FUND. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $279,000 from the
Water Pollution Control Fund to the Agricultural Best Management Practices
(BMP) Fund on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. REQUIREMENTS FOR USE OF THE WATER POLLUTION CONTROL FUND.
The appropriation of moneys from the Water Pollution Control Fund in this
act for the Department of Environmental Quality shall specifically super-
sede the provisions of Section 39-3630, Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RECOV-
ERY FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Environmen-
tal Quality any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated to the De-
partment of Environmental Quality from the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund
for water infrastructure and remediation projects for fiscal year 2026 from
the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund, to be used for nonrecurring expendi-
tures related to water infrastructure and remediation projects for the pe-
riod July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller
shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and pro-
gram, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappro-
priation authorized herein.
SECTION 8. REQUIREMENTS FOR USE OF THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND.
It is the intent of the Legislature to provide no more than $325,000,000
of ARPA funding to support construction of drinking water and wastewater
projects. Moneys shall be appropriated from the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund for this purpose. The Department of Environmental Quality may use the
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund to fund all eligible planning grant requests
received consistent with existing processes. The Department of Environmen-
tal Quality shall provide ARPA funding in the form of grants for construction
of drinking water and wastewater projects using a tiered approach that pro-


vides the highest level of grant funding to systems with the greatest level
of need but least ability to pay, as determined by factors including size of
system (smaller systems rank higher), monthly user rates, median income, and
readiness to proceed. The Department of Environmental Quality may consider
all projects meeting the intended criteria where costs were incurred after
March 3, 2021, and where construction will be completed prior to December
31, 2026. This includes funding cost overruns for existing state revolving
loan-funded projects currently under construction if they are due to factors
such as increased labor and material costs. The Department of Environmental
Quality shall provide a written update of recipients to germane legislative
committees upon approval by the Board of Environmental Quality. The Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality shall submit a report to the Governor and the
Legislature detailing progress and expenditures by January 12, 2027.
SECTION 9. USE OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding the pro-
visions of Idaho Code, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the di-
rector of the Department of Environmental Quality is prohibited from reduc-
ing the allocation of General Fund moneys provided to the Lake Pend Oreille,
Pend Oreille River, Priest Lake and Priest River Commission and the Bear Lake
Regional Commission for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 10. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION -- ENDOWMENT FUND INVESTMENT
BOARD. The Endowment Fund Investment Board is hereby granted continuous
appropriation authority for consulting fees, custodial fees, investment
manager fees, and other portfolio-related external costs for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 11. TRANSFERS FROM EARNINGS RESERVE FUNDS -- ENDOWMENT FUND
INVESTMENT BOARD. For the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, it is
hereby appropriated and the Endowment Fund Investment Board shall trans-
fer $117,278,400 as follows: $72,366,000 from the Public School Earnings
Reserve Fund to the Public School Income Fund; $2,222,400 from the Agricul-
tural College Earnings Reserve Fund to the Agricultural College Endowment
Income Fund; $8,113,160 from the Charitable Institutions Earnings Reserve
Fund to the Charitable Institutions Endowment Income Fund; $8,494,800 from
the Normal School Earnings Reserve Fund to the Normal School Endowment In-
come Fund; $3,585,600 from the Penitentiary Earnings Reserve Fund to the
Penitentiary Endowment Income Fund; $7,465,200 from the Scientific School
Earnings Reserve Fund to the Scientific School Endowment Income Fund;
$7,776,000 from the Mental Hospital Earnings Reserve Fund to the Mental
Hospital Endowment Income Fund; and $7,255,200 from the University Earnings
Reserve Fund to the University Endowment Income Fund.
SECTION 12. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS -- DE-
PARTMENT OF LANDS. The Department of Lands is hereby exempted from the pro-
visions of Section 67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited trans-
fers between expense classes for all moneys appropriated to the Forest and
Range Fire Protection Program for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to
another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.


SECTION 13. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT PRO-
GRAM -- DEPARTMENT OF PARKS AND RECREATION. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Department of Parks and Recreation any unexpended and unencumbered
balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department of Parks and
Recreation for the Capital Development Program for fiscal year 2026 to be
used for nonrecurring expenditures in the Capital Development Program for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Con-
troller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class,
and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 14. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS -- DE-
PARTMENT OF PARKS AND RECREATION. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, trustee and benefit payments appropriated to the De-
partment of Parks and Recreation for grants in the Operations Program may
be transferred to capital outlay in the Capital Development Program to re-
flect grants awarded to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. Legislative appropriations shall not
be transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the
Legislature.
SECTION 15. CASH TRANSFER FOR AQUIFER MANAGEMENT -- DEPARTMENT OF WATER
RESOURCES. Of the amount appropriated to the Department of Water Resources
in Section 1 of this act for the Planning and Technical Services Program
from the General Fund, the Office of the State Controller shall transfer
$5,000,000 to the Secondary Aquifer Planning, Management, and Implementa-
tion Fund on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to be used for aquifer recharge and man-
agement.
SECTION 16. CASH TRANSFER FOR THE FLOOD MANAGEMENT PROGRAM -- DEPART-
MENT OF WATER RESOURCES. Of the amount appropriated to the Department of
Water Resources in Section 1 of this act for the Planning and Technical
Services Program from the General Fund, the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer $1,000,000 to the Water Management Fund on July 1, 2026, or as
soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027, to be used for hydrologic data collection, monitoring and modeling,
flood-damaged stream channel repair, stream channel improvement, flood risk
reduction, or flood prevention projects. These moneys shall be administered
by the Idaho Water Resource Board through a competitive, matching grant
process that prioritizes projects based on the public benefits they provide.
SECTION 17. CASH TRANSFER FOR WATER PROJECTS -- DEPARTMENT OF WATER RE-
SOURCES. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Water Resources
and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $30,000,000 from the
General Fund to the Water Management Fund on July 1, 2026, or as soon there-
after as practicable for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to be
used for water projects.


SECTION 18. WATER MANAGEMENT FUND PROJECTS. Of the amount appropriated
to the Department of Water Resources in Section 1 of this act, $30,000,000
shall be used for water projects pursuant to the following criteria:
(1) The Water Resource Board shall use the funds for planning, con-
struction, rehabilitation, reconstruction, and improvement of water infra-
structure throughout the state. Projects shall prioritize:
(a) Aquifer recharge, ground water management, and other projects
aimed at sustaining aquifer health and long-term water availability;
(b) Development and rehabilitation of water storage and conveyance
systems, including reservoirs, diversion structures, pipelines, and
canals;
(c) Water supply and delivery improvements that enhance efficiency and
conservation; and
(d) Emergency water infrastructure repairs and upgrades to ensure the
resilience of vital water systems.
(2) Of the moneys appropriated in a single year, no more than 50% of the
funds appropriated in this section may be used within a single board dis-
trict, as defined in section 42-1732, Idaho Code, unless there are no com-
peting funding applications for water infrastructure projects in other dis-
tricts for the current fiscal year.
(3) The Department of Water Resources shall provide a report to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee, to the relevant germane legisla-
tive committees, and to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office no later than December 5, 2026. This report
shall include information required in Section 42-1760(3), Idaho Code, in a
format determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Divi-
sion of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 19. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are
authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 20. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 21. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.